lexd_components/hyw-verbs_kouyoumdjian.lexd
ազգատել:ազգատ <tv>
ազդագրել:ազդագր <tv>
ալեկոծել:ալեկոծ <tv>
ալիւրոտել:ալիւրոտ <tv>
ախորժել:ախորժ <tv>
ածանցել:ածանց <tv>
ակաղձել:ակաղձ <tv>
ականահարել:ականահար <tv>
ականել:ական <tv>
ակնածել:ակնած <tv>
ակնահարել:ակնահար <tv>
ակօսաբեկել:ակօսաբեկ <tv>
ակօսել:ակօս <tv>
աղաթափել:աղաթափ <tv>
աղանդել:աղանդ <tv>
աղբել:աղբ <tv>
աղբորակել:աղբորակ <tv>
աղեղնաբանել:աղեղնաբան <tv>
աղեղնել:աղեղն <tv>
աղերսագրել:աղերսագր <iv>
աղիւսագործել:աղիւսագործ <tv>
աղիւսել:աղիւս <tv>
աղխաղխել:աղխաղխ <tv>
աղխել:աղխ <tv>
աղճատաբանել:աղճատաբան <iv>
աղշկորել:աղշկոր <tv>
աղուեսանենգել:աղուեսանենգ <tv>
աղտեղել:աղտեղ <tv>
աղցանել:աղցան <tv>
աճառել:աճառ <tv>
աճել:աճ <iv>
ամաչել:ամաչ <iv>
ամբոխել:ամբոխ <tv>
ամորձատել:ամորձատ <tv>
ամպահարել:ամպահար <tv>
ամպաչուել:ամպաչու <iv>
այգորել:այգոր <tv>
այլաբանել:այլաբան <tv>
այլագունել:այլագուն <tv>
այլակերպել:այլակերպ <tv>
այլայլել:այլայլ <tv>
այլաշրջել:այլաշրջ <tv>
այլաւորել:այլաւոր <tv>
այլափառել:այլափառ <iv>
այլափոխել:այլափոխ <tv>
այրասպանել:այրասպան <iv>
այցել:այց <tv>
անագազօծել:անագազօծ <tv>
անագանել:անագան <iv>
անագել:անագ <tv>
անամպել:անամպ <tv>
անապատել:անապատ <tv>
անգնահատել:անգնահատ <tv>
անգուշել:անգուշ <iv>
անգրիճել:անգրիճ <tv>
անդաճել:անդաճ <iv>
անդամալուծել:անդամալուծ <tv>
անդամակցել:անդամակց <tv>
անդամահատել:անդամահատ <tv>
անդամահերձել:անդամահերձ <tv>
անդաչափել:անդաչափ <tv>
անդորրագրել:անդորրագր <tv>
անդորրել:անդորր <tv>
անդրադարձել:անդրադարձ <tv>
անզուգել:անզուգ <tv>
անթոյլատրել:անթոյլատր <tv>
անժառանգել:անժառանգ <tv>
անիծանել:անիծան <tv>
անիսոնել:անիսոն <tv>
անիրաւել:անիրաւ <tv>
անխայել:անխայ <tv>
անկանել:անկան <tv>
անկողնագործել:անկողնագործ <tv>
անկուշել:անկուշ <iv>
անհամել:անհամ <iv>
անհնազանդել:անհնազանդ <tv>
անմեղադրել:անմեղադր <tv>
անյիշատակել:անյիշատակ <tv>
անյօդել:անյօդ <tv>
անոնել:անոն <tv>
անուանադրել:անուանադր <tv>
անուանակոչել:անուանակոչ <tv>
անուշահոտել:անուշահոտ <tv>
անուշել:անուշ <tv>
անպաճուճել:անպաճուճ <tv>
անպարտագրել:անպարտագր <tv>
անջատամասել:անջատամաս <tv>
անջրել:անջր <tv>
անջրպետել:անջրպետ <tv>
անսաստել:անսաստ <iv>
անրջաբանել:անրջաբան <iv>
անցանել:անցան <iv>
անցունել:անցուն <tv>
անօրինել:անօրին <tv>
աշխատասիրել:աշխատասիր <tv>
աշխարհադիտել:աշխարհադիտ <tv>
աշխարհակալել:աշխարհակալ <tv>
աշտանակել:աշտանակ <iv>
աչել:աչ <iv>
ապաբանել:ապաբան <tv>
ապագովել:ապագով <iv>
ապադրամել:ապադրամ <tv>
ապաթթուել:ապաթթու <tv>
ապաժուժել:ապաժուժ <iv>
ապախիժել:ապախիժ <tv>
ապախուրել:ապախուր <tv>
ապախտել:ապախտ <tv>
ապահարզանել:ապահարզան <tv>
ապահարկել:ապահարկ <tv>
ապանեխել:ապանեխ <tv>
ապաշաւել:ապաշաւ <tv>
ապավիժել:ապավիժ <tv>
ապատպել:ապատպ <tv>
ապարթանել:ապարթան <iv>
ապաւառել:ապաւառ <tv>
ապաքինել:ապաքին <tv>
ապաքցանել:ապաքցան <tv>
ապիկել:ապիկ <tv>
ապշոպել:ապշոպ <iv>
ապռել:ապռ <tv>
ապռկել:ապռկ <tv>
առագաստել:առագաստ <tv>
առագրել:առագր <tv>
առադրել:առադր <tv>
առակել:առակ <tv>
առաջամղել:առաջամղ <tv>
առաջնորդել:առաջնորդ <tv>
առասանել:առասան <tv>
առասպելաբանել:առասպելաբան <tv>
առասպելել:առասպել <iv>
առաստաղակալել:առաստաղակալ <tv>
առատաձեռնել:առատաձեռն <tv>
առափտել:առափտ <tv>
առգրել:առգր <tv>
առդատել:առդատ <tv>
առդրել:առդր <tv>
առեղծանել:առեղծան <tv>
առընթերագրել:առընթերագր <tv>
առխթել:առխթ <tv>
առխրել:առխր <tv>
առկցել:առկց <tv>
առձեռնել:առձեռն <tv>
առոգանել:առոգան <tv>
առոգել:առոգ <tv>
առոտնել:առոտն <tv>
ասել:աս <tv>
ասեղնագործել:ասեղնագործ <tv>
ասղնագործել:ասղնագործ <tv>
ասղնտել:ասղնտ <tv>
ասպազինել:ասպազին <tv>
ասպարել:ասպար <iv>
ասպնջականել:ասպնջական <tv>
աստառել:աստառ <tv>
աստեղազարդել:աստեղազարդ <tv>
աստիճանել:աստիճան <tv>
աստուածաբանել:աստուածաբան <tv>
աստուածարել:աստուածար <tv>
ատակել:ատակ <tv>
ատակել:ատակ <iv>
ատենաբանել:ատենաբան <tv>
ատենագրել:ատենագր <tv>
արատել:արատ <tv>
արարչագործել:արարչագործ <tv>
արբանեկել:արբանեկ <tv>
արբեցունել:արբեցուն <tv>
արգահատել:արգահատ <iv>
արդկել:արդկ <tv>
արզնել:արզն <tv>
արժանաւորել:արժանաւոր <tv>
արիւնոտել:արիւնոտ <tv>
արծաթազօծել:արծաթազօծ <tv>
արծաթել:արծաթ <tv>
արկանել:արկան <tv>
արկղել:արկղ <tv>
արտագաղթել:արտագաղթ <iv>
արտալածել:արտալած <tv>
արտախուրել:արտախուր <tv>
արտակերտել:արտակերտ <tv>
արտաչափել:արտաչափ <tv>
արտասահմանել:արտասահման <tv>
արտավազել:արտավազ <iv>
արտատարել:արտատար <tv>
արտափայլել:արտափայլ <iv>
արտօնագրել:արտօնագր <tv>
արփաթեւել:արփաթեւ <iv>
արփաւորել:արփաւոր <tv>
արօրադրել:արօրադր <tv>
արօրել:արօր <tv>
աւազակել:աւազակ <iv>
աւազել:աւազ <tv>
աւատականել:աւատական <tv>
աւարտաբանել:աւարտաբան <tv>
աւաքել:աւաք <iv>
աւելել:աւել <tv>
աւեղկել:աւեղկ <tv>
աւետարանել:աւետարան <tv>
աւետաւորել:աւետաւոր <tv>
աւլել:աւլ <tv>
ափլաբել:ափլաբ <iv>
ափլփել:ափլփ <iv>
աքծանել:աքծան <tv>
աքսոտել:աքսոտ <iv>
աքցոտել:աքցոտ <iv>
եբենել:եբեն <tv>
եբեներփնել:եբեներփն <tv>
եբենոսել:եբենոս <tv>
ելանել:ելան <iv>
ելեկտրահարել:ելեկտրահար <tv>
ելուզանել:ելուզան <tv>
եկակոչել:եկակոչ <tv>
եկաւորել:եկաւոր <iv>
եղարկել:եղարկ <tv>
եղեռնաբանել:եղեռնաբան <tv>
եղծագործել:եղծագործ <tv>
եղկել:եղկ <tv>
եղջիւրատել:եղջիւրատ <tv>
ենթագնահատել:ենթագնահատ <tv>
ենթավարձել:ենթավարձ <tv>
եռահատել:եռահատ <tv>
եռապատկել:եռապատկ <tv>
եսաբանել:եսաբան <iv>
ետագրել:ետագր <tv>
երազաբանել:երազաբան <iv>
երախտագործել:երախտագործ <tv>
երակաւորել:երակաւոր <tv>
երանարել:երանար <tv>
երանգել:երանգ <tv>
երանել:երան <tv>
երասանակել:երասանակ <tv>
երգաբանել:երգաբան <tv>
երգագրել:երգագր <tv>
երգիծաբանել:երգիծաբան <tv>
երգիծանել:երգիծան <tv>
երեսել:երես <tv>
երեքկնել:երեքկն <tv>
երեքօրել:երեքօր <iv>
երիվարել:երիվար <iv>
երկախառնել:երկախառն <tv>
երկայնաբանել:երկայնաբան <iv>
երկայնաձգել:երկայնաձգ <tv>
երկայնամտել:երկայնամտ <iv>
երկայնել:երկայն <tv>
երկասիրել:երկասիր <tv>
երկդիմաբանել:երկդիմաբան <tv>
երկիրպագանել:երկիրպագան <iv>
երկճեղքել:երկճեղք <tv>
երկմտել:երկմտ <iv>
երկպառակտել:երկպառակտ <tv>
երկպատկել:երկպատկ <tv>
երկրաբանել:երկրաբան <iv>
երրորդել:երրորդ <tv>
եօթներորդել:եօթներորդ <tv>
եօթնպատկել:եօթնպատկ <tv>
էացունել:էացուն <tv>
ըղերձել:ըղերձ <tv>
ըմբերել:ըմբեր <iv>
ըմպահկել:ըմպահկ <iv>
ընբերանել:ընբերան <tv>
ընգրկել:ընգրկ <tv>
ընդանել:ընդան <tv>
ընդաւազել:ընդաւազ <tv>
ընդբերանել:ընդբերան <tv>
ընդգեղձանել:ընդգեղձան <tv>
ընդգճել:ընդգճ <iv>
ընդգոգել:ընդգոգ <tv>
ընդգօտել:ընդգօտ <tv>
ընդդիմադրել:ընդդիմադր <tv>
ընդդիմադրել:ընդդիմադր <iv>
ընդդիմորոշել:ընդդիմորոշ <iv>
ընդելանել:ընդելան <iv>
ընդելուզանել:ընդելուզան <tv>
ընդեղձանել:ընդեղձան <tv>
ընդերկարել:ընդերկար <tv>
ընդխառնել:ընդխառն <tv>
ընդխառնել:ընդխառն <iv>
ընդհանրականել:ընդհանրական <iv>
ընդհարել:ընդհար <tv>
ընդհարկանել:ընդհարկան <tv>
ընդձեռել:ընդձեռ <tv>
ընդմուծանել:ընդմուծան <tv>
ընդմտանել:ընդմտան <iv>
ընդունել:ընդուն <tv>
ընդվզել:ընդվզ <tv>
ընթադրել:ընթադր <tv>
ընթերցանել:ընթերցան <tv>
ընթերցասիրել:ընթերցասիր <tv>
ընխոթել:ընխոթ <tv>
ընկալագրել:ընկալագր <tv>
ընկերագրել:ընկերագր <tv>
ընկերել:ընկեր <tv>
ընկլուզանել:ընկլուզան <tv>
ընկղմեցել:ընկղմեց <tv>
ընկնձեռնել:ընկնձեռն <tv>
ընկողմնել:ընկողմն <tv>
ընկրկել:ընկրկ <tv>
ընձեռավճռել:ընձեռավճռ <tv>
ընչազրկել:ընչազրկ <tv>
ընչաթափել:ընչաթափ <tv>
ըստգտանել:ըստգտան <tv>
ըստերիւրել:ըստերիւր <tv>
իգականել:իգական <tv>
իմաստակաբանել:իմաստակաբան <iv>
իմաստակել:իմաստակ <iv>
իմաստասիրել:իմաստասիր <iv>
ինքնօգնել:ինքնօգն <iv>
իջագրել:իջագր <tv>
իջանել:իջան <iv>
իրաւաբանել:իրաւաբան <tv>
իրաւազրկել:իրաւազրկ <tv>
իրաւախոհել:իրաւախոհ <tv>
իրաւարարել:իրաւարար <tv>
իրաւընտրել:իրաւընտր <tv>
իւղագլխել:իւղագլխ <tv>
իւղանկարել:իւղանկար <tv>
ութպատկել:ութպատկ <tv>
ուժաբեկել:ուժաբեկ <tv>
ուժազրկել:ուժազրկ <tv>
ուժաթափել:ուժաթափ <tv>
ուժահատել:ուժահատ <tv>
ուժել:ուժ <iv>
ուղեղատել:ուղեղատ <tv>
ուղերձել:ուղերձ <tv>
ուղխել:ուղխ <tv>
ուղղագործել:ուղղագործ <tv>
ուղղախօսել:ուղղախօս <iv>
ուղղանկիւնաձգել:ուղղանկիւնաձգ <tv>
ուղղաւորել:ուղղաւոր <tv>
ուղղափոխել:ուղղափոխ <tv>
ումեկել:ումեկ <tv>
ունայնաբանել:ունայնաբան <iv>
ուշադրել:ուշադր <tv>
ուռթել:ուռթ <tv>
ուռկանել:ուռկան <tv>
օդափոխել:օդափոխ <tv>
օթել:օթ <iv>
օթեւանել:օթեւան <tv>
օթոցել:օթոց <tv>
օձտել:օձտ <tv>
օտարասիրել:օտարասիր <tv>
օտարընկալել:օտարընկալ <tv>
օրաձգել:օրաձգ <tv>
օրել:օր <tv>
օրէնսդրել:օրէնսդր <iv>
օրինաւորել:օրինաւոր <tv>
օրինել:օրին <tv>
օցտել:օցտ <iv>
երագել:երագ <tv>
երագել:երագ <iv>
բազկել:բազկ <tv>
բազմաբանել:բազմաբան <iv>
բաժակել:բաժակ <tv>
բաժանել:բաժան <tv>
բաժել:բաժ <tv>
բահել:բահ <tv>
բաղազանել:բաղազան <tv>
բաղբաղել:բաղբաղ <tv>
բաղխել:բաղխ <iv>
բաղհիւսել:բաղհիւս <tv>
բամպակել:բամպակ <tv>
բանագողել:բանագող <tv>
բանագողել:բանագող <iv>
բանադատել:բանադատ <tv>
բանախօսել:բանախօս <tv>
բանակել:բանակ <tv>
բանաճառել:բանաճառ <tv>
բանասիրել:բանասիր <tv>
բանաստեղծել:բանաստեղծ <tv>
բանդագուշել:բանդագուշ <iv>
բանտել:բանտ <tv>
բաջաղել:բաջաղ <tv>
բարբառել:բարբառ <iv>
բարեգործել:բարեգործ <tv>
բարեշրջել:բարեշրջ <tv>
բարերարել:բարերար <tv>
բարեփոխել:բարեփոխ <tv>
բարեքել:բարեք <tv>
բարոյախօսել:բարոյախօս <tv>
բարոյաւորել:բարոյաւոր <tv>
բարոյել:բարոյ <tv>
բարուրել:բարուր <tv>
բարսել:բարս <tv>
բացագանչել:բացագանչ <iv>
բացօթել:բացօթ <iv>
բեկբեկել:բեկբեկ <tv>
բեկտել:բեկտ <tv>
բերկրել:բերկր <tv>
բեւեկնել:բեւեկն <tv>
բեւեռաթափել:բեւեռաթափ <tv>
բեւեռապնդել:բեւեռապնդ <tv>
բզզել:բզզ <iv>
բթամտել:բթամտ <tv>
բթել:բթ <tv>
բիբել:բիբ <iv>
բխել:բխ <iv>
բծաւորել:բծաւոր <tv>
բծել:բծ <tv>
բղխել:բղխ <iv>
բնակափոխել:բնակափոխ <iv>
բնակել:բնակ <iv>
բոլորակել:բոլորակ <tv>
բոհբոհել:բոհբոհ <iv>
բոշխնել:բոշխն <tv>
բովհրել:բովհր <tv>
բորակածնել:բորակածն <tv>
բոցազրկել:բոցազրկ <tv>
բոցավառել:բոցավառ <tv>
բուծանել:բուծան <tv>
բչել:բչ <iv>
բռածեփել:բռածեփ <tv>
բռնազբօսել:բռնազբօս <tv>
բռնակալել:բռնակալ <tv>
բռնահարել:բռնահար <tv>
բռնաւորել:բռնաւոր <tv>
բրդգզել:բրդգզ <tv>
գագաշել:գագաշ <iv>
գագացել:գագաց <iv>
գահել:գահ <tv>
գաղափարել:գաղափար <tv>
գաղթագործել:գաղթագործ <tv>
գաղտորսել:գաղտորս <iv>
գաճոտել:գաճոտ <tv>
գանգրել:գանգր <tv>
գանչել:գանչ <iv>
գասկոնաբանել:գասկոնաբան <iv>
գարգաշել:գարգաշ <iv>
գարշել:գարշ <iv>
գաւազանել:գաւազան <tv>
գեղերեսել:գեղերես <tv>
գեղերփնել:գեղերփն <tv>
գեղեցկաբանել:գեղեցկաբան <tv>
գետահետել:գետահետ <iv>
գետանաւել:գետանաւ <tv>
գետնաչափել:գետնաչափ <tv>
գետնաքարշել:գետնաքարշ <iv>
գերագրգռել:գերագրգռ <tv>
գերադրել:գերադր <tv>
գերակշռել:գերակշռ <tv>
գթել:գթ <iv>
գլխահատել:գլխահատ <tv>
գխտորել:գխտոր <tv>
գձձել:գձձ <tv>
գնադրել:գնադր <tv>
գնդակոծել:գնդակոծ <tv>
գնդել:գնդ <tv>
գոգել:գոգ <tv>
գոզգոզել:գոզգոզ <iv>
գոհոլել:գոհոլ <tv>
գողել:գող <tv>
գոյափոխել:գոյափոխ <tv>
գորովատել:գորովատ <tv>
գորովել:գորով <iv>
գունագեղել:գունագեղ <tv>
գունատել:գունատ <tv>
գունաւորել:գունաւոր <tv>
գրաւադրել:գրաւադր <tv>
գրաւաթափել:գրաւաթափ <tv>
գրաւականել:գրաւական <tv>
գրգել:գրգ <tv>
գրեխել:գրեխ <tv>
գրթահարել:գրթահար <tv>
գրկախառնել:գրկախառն <tv>
գօշել:գօշ <tv>
դամասկել:դամասկ <tv>
դամասկինել:դամասկին <tv>
դամբարանել:դամբարան <tv>
դայեկել:դայեկ <tv>
դաշնադրել:դաշնադր <tv>
դաշնակել:դաշնակ <tv>
դաշունահարել:դաշունահար <tv>
դատազանցել:դատազանց <tv>
դատախազել:դատախազ <tv>
դատակնքել:դատակնք <tv>
դարահոսել:դարահոս <iv>
դարել:դար <iv>
դարպասել:դարպաս <iv>
դդնչել:դդնչ <iv>
դեդեւել:դեդեւ <iv>
դեռախօսել:դեռախօս <tv>
դերձանել:դերձան <tv>
դժրել:դժր <tv>
դիազարդել:դիազարդ <tv>
դիմաբանել:դիմաբան <tv>
դիմակաւորել:դիմակաւոր <iv>
դիւակոչել:դիւակոչ <tv>
դիւահանել:դիւահան <iv>
դիւրել:դիւր <tv>
դնդչել:դնդչ <iv>
դուդել:դուդ <tv>
դռնչել:դռնչ <iv>
դսրովել:դսրով <tv>
դրամարկել:դրամարկ <tv>
դրամափորձել:դրամափորձ <tv>
դրասանգել:դրասանգ <tv>
դրդուաղել:դրդուաղ <iv>
դրդուել:դրդու <tv>
դրնդել:դրնդ <tv>
դրուագել:դրուագ <tv>
դրօշել:դրօշ <tv>
ենթստանձնել:ենթստանձն <tv>
զազրաբանել:զազրաբան <iv>
զազրագործել:զազրագործ <iv>
զականել:զական <tv>
զանգանել:զանգան <tv>
զանգիտել:զանգիտ <iv>
զանցանել:զանցան <tv>
զաչաղել:զաչաղ <tv>
զառածանել:զառածան <tv>
զառաջել:զառաջ <iv>
զատորոշել:զատորոշ <tv>
զարկանել:զարկան <tv>
զարհուրել:զարհուր <tv>
զարմանագործել:զարմանագործ <tv>
զգեռել:զգեռ <iv>
զգրգռել:զգրգռ <tv>
զելանել:զելան <iv>
զեղծանել:զեղծան <tv>
զեմեղել:զեմեղ <tv>
զերծանել:զերծան <tv>
զզուել:զզու <tv>
զըւռտել:զըւռտ <tv>
զիթկել:զիթկ <iv>
զինանշանել:զինանշան <tv>
զինկապատել:զինկապատ <tv>
զինկապել:զինկապ <tv>
զինկել:զինկ <tv>
զինուորել:զինուոր <tv>
զիջանել:զիջան <iv>
զիրարել:զիրար <tv>
զնդանել:զնդան <tv>
զոհագործել:զոհագործ <tv>
զոշոտել:զոշոտ <tv>
զուարճաբանել:զուարճաբան <iv>
զուգաբաժանել:զուգաբաժան <tv>
զուգաբանել:զուգաբան <iv>
զուգաթուել:զուգաթու <tv>
զուգախառնել:զուգախառն <tv>
զուգակարգել:զուգակարգ <tv>
զուգաձայնել:զուգաձայն <tv>
զուգամանակել:զուգամանակ <tv>
զուգայարել:զուգայար <tv>
զուգատօնել:զուգատօն <tv>
զուրցել:զուրց <tv>
զռնչել:զռնչ <iv>
զտեղել:զտեղ <tv>
զրադատել:զրադատ <tv>
զրուցաբանել:զրուցաբան <iv>
